Vermont, session 2025-2026, H278.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8017 is added to read:
§ 8017. ENERGY RESILIENCY PLAN AND MAP
(a) On or before December 31, 2026, in order to develop a plan to help
develop energy storage assets and flexible load solutions and address repeated
VT LEG #379347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.278
2025 Page 2 of 5
issues with the electric grid, Vermont’s distribution and transmission utilities
shall develop and submit a report, including a map, establishing where storage
assets and flexible load management initiatives, and how much of each
solution, have the greatest potential to mitigate, resolve, or forestall
distribution grid and transmission grid reliability, affordability, community
resiliency, and sustainability issues. This report shall utilize all relevant utility,
State, and regional system reliability data and projected load growth and
community health indicator data to identify where public and private fund
investments will deliver the greatest value. This report and map shall be used
as a guide for where best to site energy storage facilities and direct flexible
load initiatives and will estimate the type and amount of each energy solution.
(b) The report shall also:
(1) provide a reasonable cost-benefit analysis that presents a general
quantification of the value of the return on the dollars invested in energy
storage assets and flexible load management initiatives, including benefits of
responsible investments and associated returns, financial and nonfinancial, to
ratepayers from the provision of services, including energy price arbitrage,
capacity, ancillary services, and transmission and distribution asset deferral or
substitution;
(2) direct long-term investment returns to ratepayers that deploy energy
storage systems and leverage flexible load management capabilities;
VT LEG #379347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.278
2025 Page 3 of 5
(3) improve the ability to integrate renewable resources at the local,
State, and regional level;
(4) improve reliability and power quality;
(5) estimate the effect on retail electric rates over the life of a given
energy storage system compared to the effect on retail electric rates using a
nonenergy storage system alternative over the life of the nonenergy storage
system alternative;
(6) identify utility service territories or communities or buildings where
adding energy storage assets would provide a major enhanced reliability
benefit, including helping to keep a hospital, community center, warming
shelter, emergency response facility, or other key building or buildings online
during an outage;
(7) identify areas with significant existing grid constraints for
electrification and for distribution generation;
(8) estimate reduced greenhouse gas emissions; and
(9) estimate economic development benefits.
(c) The Department shall collaborate, as necessary, in the development of
the plan with electric and efficiency utilities, Vermont Electric Power
Company (VELCO), regional planning commissions, and energy and
environmental organizations and shall integrate the report and map findings
VT LEG #379347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.278
2025 Page 4 of 5
into existing required energy plans and present it to the Climate Council for
inclusion in the Climate Action Plan.
(d) The Department may require stakeholders to sign confidentiality
agreements to address any confidential and proprietary information; however,
the map shall be made available to relevant stakeholders involved in energy
storage and flexible load management.
(e) The Department shall submit the report and map to the Public Utility
Commission and, to the degree that energy security allows, the General
Assembly, identifying those areas with energy storage assets and flexible load
management initiatives, including how much of each type of resource could
deliver the greatest reliability, affordability, community resiliency, and
sustainability value, including the associated quantitative and qualitative
benefits with different investment and deployment scenarios.
(f) The plan shall be updated biennially. Future revisions of the plan shall
include review of the Municipal Energy Resilience Program assessment,
VELCO’s Long-Range Transmission Plan, the environmental justice mapping
tool, distribution utility integrated resource plans, efficiency utility demand
response plans, and other relevant data.
(g) The Clean Energy Development Board shall use the energy resiliency
plan as a guide to award grants for the development of energy storage facilities
in the identified locations.
VT LEG #379347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.278
2025 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8015 is amended to read:
§ 8015. VERMONT CLEAN ENERGY DEVELOPMENT FUND
* * *
(e) Management of Fund.
* * *
(3) There is created the Clean Energy Development Board, which shall
consist of seven persons appointed in accordance with subdivision (4) of this
subsection.
* * *
(C) The Board shall utilize the report developed under section 8017
of this title.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379347 v.1